Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
ARTICLE 30
REGULATION OF CIGARETTES, TOBACCO PRODUCTS,
AND NICOTINE PRODUCTS

Section

29-30-101. Regulation of cigarettes, tobacco products, and nicotine products.

The city council of a statutory or home rule city or the town council of a statutory town may adopt an ordinance to regulate the possession or purchasing of cigarettes, tobacco products, or nicotine products, as defined in section 18-13-121 (5), by a minor or to regulate the sale of cigarettes, tobacco products, or nicotine products to minors.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added, (HB 19-1033), ch. 53, p. 185, § 3, effective July 1.